Hawaii statutes.
§88-74.7 Commencement of benefits on required beginning date. (a) The purpose of this section is to provide for distribution
of benefits in accordance with a reasonable and good faith interpretation of
section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code. Section 401(a)(9) of the
Internal Revenue Code requires that the "entire interest" of a member
be distributed or that distribution of the member's benefits begin no later
than the member's "required beginning date".

(b)
For the purposes of this section, "required beginning date" means
April 1 of the calendar year following the calendar year in which a member
terminates service or attains age seventy and one-half, whichever is later.

(c)
A member or former member's accumulated contributions or hypothetical account
balance, as defined in section 88-311, shall be paid to the member or former
member, or payment of the benefits payable under part II, VII, or VIII of this
chapter shall commence, no later than the member's or former member's required
beginning date. The payment or payments shall be made on, or beginning no
later than, the member's or former member's required beginning date even if the
member or former member does not apply for payment or file a retirement
application.

(d)
If, by a member's or former member's required beginning date:

(1) The member or former member's accumulated
contributions or hypothetical account balance, as defined in section 88-311,
are not paid to the member or former member; or

(2) Payment of the benefits payable under part II,
VII, or VIII of this chapter do not commence,

the system shall pay the service
retirement benefits for which the member or former member is eligible pursuant
to part II, VII, or VIII of this chapter, as applicable, retroactive to the
member's or former member's required beginning date with regular interest.

(e)
If the system does not receive a written election from the member or former
member under section 88-83, 88-283, or 88-333, as applicable, prior to the
later of the member's or former member's required beginning date or sixty days
following the receipt by the member or former member of notice from the system
that the member or former member is required to make an election, the following
election shall be deemed to have been made as of the member or former member's
required beginning date:

(1) If the member or former member is unmarried or
has no reciprocal beneficiary, the member or former member shall be deemed to
have elected the maximum retirement allowance; or

(2) If the member or former member is married or has
a reciprocal beneficiary, the member or former member shall be deemed to have
elected option 3 under section 88-83, or option A under section 88-283, as
applicable, and to have designated the member's or former member's spouse or
reciprocal beneficiary as the member's or former member's beneficiary;

provided that if the system
receives the written election after the member's or former member's required
beginning date, but within sixty days following receipt by the member or former
member of notice from the system that the member or former member is required
to make the election, the written election shall apply, and the member's or
former member's retirement benefit shall be recomputed, based on the written
election, retroactive to the member or former member's required beginning
date. The amount of any underpayment resulting from recomputing the benefit
shall bear regular interest. If recomputing the benefit results in an
overpayment, payments shall be adjusted so that the actuarial equivalent of the
benefit to which the member or former member was correctly entitled shall be
paid.

(f)
If the system does not have current information about the member's or former
member's marital or reciprocal beneficiary status at the time of a deemed
election, the following presumptions shall apply:

(1) If the member or former member was married or had
a reciprocal beneficiary at the time the member or former member last provided
information to the system about the member's or former member's marital or
reciprocal beneficiary status, it shall be presumed that the member or former
member is still married to the same spouse or is in the same reciprocal
beneficiary relationship. If the system does not have information as to the
age of the spouse or reciprocal beneficiary, the spouse or reciprocal
beneficiary shall be presumed to be forty years younger than the member or
former member for purposes of computing the member's or former member's
benefit; and

(2) If the member or former member was unmarried and
did not have a reciprocal beneficiary at the time the member or former member
last provided information to the system about the member or former member's
marital status, it shall be presumed that the member or former member is
married and that the spouse of the member or former member is forty years
younger than the member or former member.

(g)
The presumptions in subsection (f) shall cease to apply when the member or
former member provides the system with current information as to the member's
or former member's marital or reciprocal beneficiary status and the age of the
member or former member's spouse or reciprocal beneficiary, if any, on the
member's or former member's required beginning date. The information shall be
provided in a form satisfactory to the system. At that time, the member's or
former member's retirement allowance shall be recomputed, retroactive to the
member's or former member's required beginning date, based on the updated
information; provided that, except as provided in subsection (e), the member or
former member shall not be permitted to change the member's or former member's
retirement allowance option election or beneficiary; provided further that the
benefit being paid to any member or former member who, on the member's or
former member's required beginning date, was unmarried and did not have a
reciprocal beneficiary, but who was deemed to elect option 3 or option A with
an assumed spouse or reciprocal beneficiary, shall be converted to the maximum
retirement allowance retroactive to the member's or former member's required
beginning date. The amount of any underpayment resulting from recomputing the
benefit shall bear regular interest. If recomputing the benefit results in an
overpayment, payments shall be adjusted so that the actuarial equivalent of the
benefit to which the member or former member was correctly entitled shall be
paid.

(h)
If the system cannot locate the member or former member, the member's or former
member's benefit shall be payable only until the end of the member's or former
member's life expectancy, as determined at the member's or former member's
required beginning date. If the member or former member has not by that time
made a claim for benefits, the member or former member shall be deemed to be
deceased at that time. Interest under subsection (d) shall cease on benefits
presumed to be abandoned property, pursuant to part I of chapter 523A, upon
payment of the property to the administrator under part I of chapter 523A.

(i) Rules necessary for the
purposes of this section shall be adopted as provided in section 88-22.5. [L
2011, c 96, §2; am L 2013, c 123, §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next